New York, session 2025-2026, A8656.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph i of subdivision 1 of section 13-0339-a of the 2 environmental conservation law, as amended by chapter 302 of the laws of 3 2022, is amended to read as follows: 4 i. hickory shad (Alosa mediocris) until December thirty-first, two 5 thousand [twenty-five] twenty-eight. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09961-01-5